Louisiana, session 2026, HB278.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 13:1401.2 through 1401.5 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1401.2. The Family Court of East Baton Rouge Parish; constitutional access
A. Article I, Section 22 of the Louisiana Constitution of 1974, known as the
"Access to Courts" clause, mandates that "All courts shall be open, and every person
shall have an adequate remedy by due process of law and justice, administered
without denial, partiality, or unreasonable delay."
B. Notwithstanding an other provision of law to the contrary, The Family
Court of East Baton Rouge Parish shall provide for live streaming, remote public
access of all court proceedings, including status conferences.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-718 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 278
C. Any costs for upgrading the current internet system to provide live
streaming, remote access to the public shall be paid from funds in the Court
Modernization and Technology Fund pursuant to R.S. 39:100.211.
§1401.3. The Family Court of East Baton Rouge Parish; sitting in chambers
The court may sit in chambers only to take the testimony of a minor with the
parties and counsel of record present, whether contested or not, in the discretion of
the judge.
§1401.4. The Family Court for the Parish of East Baton Rouge; custody matters
In all custody matters, the court may invoke the use of the minors initials or
a pseudonym for the minor and all parties to the suit shall refer to the minor by such
initials or pseudonym during the proceedings.
§1401.5. The Family Court of East Baton Rouge Parish; closed custody hearing
A custody hearing shall not be closed to the public unless all of the following
occur:
(1) The judge determines on the record that good cause exists based upon
evidence submitted.
(2) All parties have agreed, in writing and on the record, to the closing of the
courtroom to the public.
Section 2. The live streaming, remote public access described in R.S. 13:1401.2(B)
as enacted by Section 1 of this Act shall be provided for all court proceedings, including
status conferences, no later than January 1, 2027.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.